Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1213.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5624. Customer notice of atypical water usage.A municipal authority shall provide notice to utility customers if the municipal authority determines that the water usage has increased by 200% for one month above the average water usage for the property. The municipal authority shall make reasonable efforts via telephone and electronic mail to inform the utility customer of the increase in usage and assist the utility customer in identifying potential leaks or other wasteful inefficiencies on the property.123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. Title 66 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1354.1. Customer notice of atypical water usage.A public utility shall provide notice to utility customers if the public utility determines that the water usage has increased by 200% for one month above the average water usage for the property. The public utility shall make reasonable efforts via telephone and electronic mail to inform the utility customer of the increase in usage and assist the utility customer in identifying potential leaks or other wasteful inefficiencies on the property.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1213PN1361 - 2 - 1234567891011